Mississippi statutes. Title 79. Corporations, Associations, and Partnerships
Subarticle C. Standards of Conduct.

§79-4-8.30.
General standards for directors.

Each member of the board of directors, when discharging the duties of a director, shall act:

In good faith, and

In a manner the director reasonably believes to be in the best interests of the corporation.

A committee of the board of directors of which the director is not a member if the director reasonably believes the committee merits confidence.

The long-term as well as short-term interests of the corporation and its shareholders, including the possibility that these interests may be best served by the continued independence of the corporation.

The members of the board of directors or a committee of the board, when becoming informed in connection with their decision-making function or devoting attention to their oversight function, shall discharge their duties with the care that a person in a like position would reasonably believe appropriate under similar circumstances.

In discharging board or committee duties a director, who does not have knowledge that makes reliance unwarranted, is entitled to rely on the performance by any of the persons specified in subsection (e)(1) or subsection (e)(3) to whom the board may have delegated, formally or informally by course of conduct, the authority or duty to perform one or more of the board’s functions that are delegable under applicable law.

In discharging board or committee duties a director, who does not have knowledge that makes reliance unwarranted, is entitled to rely on information, opinions, reports or statements, including financial statements and other financial data, prepared or presented by any of the persons specified in subsection (e).

A director is entitled to rely, in accordance with subsection (c) or (d), on:

One or more officers or employees of the corporation whom the director reasonably believes to be reliable and competent in the functions performed or the information, opinions, reports or statements provided;

Legal counsel, public accountants, or other persons retained by the corporation as to matters involving skills or expertise the director reasonably believes are matters (i) within the particular person’s professional or expert competence or (ii) as to which the particular person merits confidence; or

For purposes of this section, a director, in determining what he reasonably believes to be in the best interests of the corporation, shall consider the interests of the corporation’s shareholders and, in his discretion, may consider any of the following:

The interests of the corporation’s employees, suppliers, creditors and customers;

The economy of the state and nation;

Community and societal considerations;

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 8.30; Laws, 1990, ch. 538, § 5; Laws, 1999, ch. 471, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1999.

The 1999 amendment rewrote the section.

Creation of, delegation of authority to, or action by a committee as not constituting compliance by director with standards of conduct described in § 79-4-8.30, see § 79-4-8.25.

Liability of director who votes for or assents to unlawful distribution without complying with applicable standards of conduct described in § 79-4-8.30, see § 79-4-8.33.

Provisions governing directors’ conflicts of interest, see § 79-4-8.60 through 79-4-8.63.

Dissolution of corporation as not subjecting corporation’s directors and officers to standards of conduct different from those prescribed in this article, see § 79-4-14.05.

Misapplication or waste of corporate assets as ground for judicial dissolution of corporation, see § 79-4-14.30.

Directors acting in manner that is illegal, oppressive or fraudulent as grounds for judicial dissolution of corporation, see § 79-4-14.30.

General standards for directors under Mississippi Nonprofit Corporation Act, see §§ 79-11-267 through 79-11-270.

In a close corporation where a majority stockholder stands to benefit as a controlling stockholder, the majority’s action must be “intrinsically fair” to the minority interest. Thus, stockholders in close corporations must bear towards each other the same relationship of trust and confidence which prevails in partnerships, rather than resort to statutory defenses. This does not mean that directors, executive officers and stockholders are not required to adhere to the corporate statutes; rather, blind adherence to corporate statutes may not be used to circumvent the corporation’s by-laws, charter or various agreements, such as a stock redemption agreement, because of the “intrinsically fair” standard that is now adopted. Fought v. Morris, 543 So. 2d 167, 1989 Miss. LEXIS 221 (Miss. 1989).

Generally, a director violates no duty by dealing in his or her own stock on his or her own account. This rule is not applicable, however, when there is a showing that a closely held corporation has a practice of purchasing its own stock, or that it ever contemplated doing so, as evidenced by a stock redemption agreement, in order to maintain proportionate control of the corporation. Fought v. Morris, 543 So. 2d 167, 1989 Miss. LEXIS 221 (Miss. 1989).

Duty and liability of closely held corporation, its directors, officers, or majority stockholders, in acquiring stock of minority shareholder.
7 A.L.R.3d 500.

Liability of corporate directors for negligence in permitting mismanagement or defalcation by officers or employees.
25 A.L.R.3d 941.

Persons liable under statutes imposing, upon directors, officers, or trustees of a corporation, personal liability for its debts on account of their failure to file or publish reports, required by law, as to corporate matters.
39 A.L.R.3d 428.

Liability of director or dominant shareholder for enforcing debt legally owed him by corporation.
56 A.L.R.3d 212.

What business opportunities are in “line of business” of corporation for purposes of determining whether a corporate opportunity was presented. 77 A.L.R.3d 961.

Duty to disclose material facts to stock purchaser. 80 A.L.R.3d 13.

Validity of stockholders’ agreement allegedly infringing on directors’ management powers – modern cases.
15 A.L.R.4th 1078.

Financial inability of corporation to take advantage of business opportunity as affecting determination whether “corporate opportunity” was presented.
16 A.L.R.4th 185.

Purchase of shares of corporation by director or officer as usurpation of “corporate opportunity.”
16 A.L.R.4th 784.

Availability of and time for bringing action against former director, officer, or stockholder in dissolved corporation for personal injuries incurred after final dissolution.
20 A.L.R.4th 414.

Liability of corporate director, officer, or employee for tortious interference with corporation’s contract with another.
72 A.L.R.4th 492.

18B Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations §§ 1455 et seq.

9 Am. Jur. Proof of Facts 2d 57, Corporate Officer or Director as Alter Ego of Corporation.

19 C.J.S., Corporations §§ 848 et seq.

Smith, Recognition of the fiduciary duties of corporate directors and officers defending against change of control by tender offer.
7 Miss. C. L. Rev. 117, Spring, 1987.

Transactions between a corporation and its directors: Where does Mississippi stand?
52 Miss L. J. 877, December, 1982.

Robertson, The Law of Corporate Governance: Coming of Age in Mississippi? 65 Miss. L. J. 477.

§79-4-8.31.
Standards of liability for directors.

A director shall not be liable to the corporation or its shareholders for any decision to take or not to take action, or any failure to take any action, as a director, unless the party asserting liability in a proceeding establishes that:

No defense by the director based on (i) any provision in the articles of incorporation authorized by Section 79-4-2.02(b)(4) or the protection afforded by Section 79-4-8.61 for action taken in compliance with Section 79-4-8.62 or 79-4-8.63, or (ii) the protection afforded by Section 79-4-8.70, precludes liability; and

The challenged conduct consisted or was the result of:

For other money payment under an equitable remedy, such as profit recovery by or disgorgement to the corporation, shall also have whatever persuasion burden may be called for to establish that the equitable remedy sought is appropriate in the circumstances.

Action not in good faith; or

A decision:

Which the director did not reasonably believe to be in the best interests of the corporation; or

As to which the director was not informed to an extent the director reasonably believed appropriate in the circumstances; or

A lack of objectivity due to the director’s familial, financial or business relationship with, or a lack of independence due to the director’s domination or control by, another person having a material interest in the challenged conduct:

Which relationship or which domination or control could reasonably be expected to have affected the director’s judgment respecting the challenged conduct in a manner adverse to the corporation; and

After a reasonable expectation to such effect has been established, the director shall not have established that the challenged conduct was reasonably believed by the director to be in the best interests of the corporation; or

A sustained failure of the director to devote attention to ongoing oversight of the business and affairs of the corporation, or a failure to devote timely attention, by making (or causing to be made) appropriate inquiry, when particular facts and circumstances of significant concern materialize that would alert a reasonably attentive director to the need therefor; or

Receipt of a financial benefit to which the director was not entitled or any other breach of the director’s duties to deal fairly with the corporation and its shareholders that is actionable under applicable law.

The party seeking to hold the director liable:

For money damages, shall also have the burden of establishing that:

Harm to the corporation or its shareholders has been suffered; and

The harm suffered was proximately caused by the director’s challenged conduct; or

For other money payment under a legal remedy, such as compensation for the unauthorized use of corporate assets, shall also have whatever persuasion burden may be called for to establish that the payment sought is appropriate in the circumstances; or

Nothing contained in this section shall (1) in any instance where fairness is at issue, such as consideration of the fairness of a transaction to the corporation under Section 79-4-8.61(b)(3), alter the burden of proving the fact or lack of fairness otherwise applicable, (2) alter the fact or lack of liability of a director under another section of this act, such as the provisions governing the consequences of an unlawful distribution under Section 79-4-8.33 or a transactional interest under Section 79-4-8.61, or (3) affect any rights to which the corporation or a shareholder may be entitled under another statute of this state or the United States.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1999, ch. 471, § 2; Laws, 2012, ch. 481, § 21, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2013.

A prior § 79-4-8.31 [Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 8.31, eff from and after January 1, 1988] was repealed by Laws, 1990, ch. 538, § 10, eff from and after July 1, 1990. That section pertained to director’s conflicts of interests. For provisions governing directors’ conflicts of interest, see §§ 79-4-8.60 through 79-4-8.63.

The 2012 amendment, effective January 1, 2013, in (a)(1), added “No defense by the director based on (i)” to the beginning and substituted “or (ii) the protection afforded by Section 79-4-8.70, precludes” for “if interposed as a bar to the proceeding by the director, does not preclude” at the end; and rewrote (a)(2)(iv).

Limit on liability of directors for acts or omissions imposed by law, see § 79-4-7.32.

General standards for directors under Mississippi Nonprofit Corporation Act, see §§ 79-11-267 through 79-11-270.

§79-4-8.33.
Liability for unlawful distributions.

A director who votes for or assents to a distribution in excess of what may be authorized and made pursuant to Section 79-4-6.40(a) or 79-4-14.09(a) is personally liable to the corporation for the amount of the distribution that exceeds what could have been distributed without violating Section 79-4-6.40(a) or 79-4-14.09(a) if the party asserting liability establishes that when taking the action the director did not comply with Section 79-4-8.30.

A director held liable under subsection (a) for an unlawful distribution is entitled to:

Contribution from every other director who could be held liable under subsection (a) for the unlawful distribution; and

Recoupment from each shareholder of the pro rata portion of the amount of the unlawful distribution the shareholder accepted, knowing the distribution was made in violation of Section 79-4-6.40(a) or 79-4-14.09(a).

A proceeding to enforce:

The liability of a director under subsection (a) is barred unless it is commenced within two (2) years after the date (i) on which the effect of the distribution was measured under Section 79-4-6.40(e) or (g); (ii) as of which the violation of Section 79-4-6.40(a) occurred as the consequence of disregard of a restriction in the articles of incorporation; or (iii) on which the distribution of assets to shareholders under Section 79-4-14.09(a) was made; or

Contribution or recoupment under subsection (b) is barred unless it is commenced within one (1) year after the liability of the claimant has been finally adjudicated under subsection (a).

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 8.33; Laws, 1988, ch. 369, § 4; Laws, 1999, ch. 471, § 3; Laws, 2001, ch. 435, § 11, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

The 1999 amendment rewrote the section.

The 2001 amendment inserted “or 79-4-14.09(a)” following “Section 79-4-6.40(a)” twice in (a) and once in (b)(2); and in (c)(1), inserted “(i)” following “after the date” and “(ii)” following “or (g),” and added the language following “or (iii).”

Liability for unlawful distributions under this section excepted from requirment that articles of incorporation set forth a provision eliminating or limiting liability of director or shareholders for money damages and a provision permitting or making obligatory indemnification of director for liability as defined in § 79-4-8.50(4), see § 79-4-2.02.

Directors acting in manner that is illegal, oppressive or fraudulent as grounds for judicial dissolution of corporation, see § 79-4-14.30.

Misapplication or waste of corporate assets as ground for judicial dissolution of corporation, see § 79-4-14.30.

Payment of claims and distribution of assets of dissolved corporations, see § 79-4-14.09.

General standards for directors under Mississippi Nonprofit Corporation Act, see §§ 79-11-267 through 79-11-270.

The fact that a direct remedy is given the creditors by the statute is not intended to deprive the corporation itself of the right to hold an officer to account for breach of his duty to it. In re Dalton Electric Co., 7 F. Supp. 465, 1934 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 1642 (D. Miss. 1934).

Bill in chancery against directors of insolvent bank charging them with liability for making a loan in excess of one-fifth of the bank’s capital to a director after his resignation, on the grounds that the notes representing the loan were either signed or delivered while he was director, or that the loan had been agreed upon while he was director and the notes subsequently executed, was insufficient to show liability under former enactment of this section (§ 922, Code 1906), since bill affirmatively showed that borrower was not a director at the time the loan was made. Bramlette v. Joseph, 111 Miss. 379, 71 So. 643, 1916 Miss. LEXIS 307 (Miss. 1916).

Personal liability of one who signs or indorses without qualification commercial paper of corporation.
82 A.L.R.2d 424.

Duty and liability of closely held corporation, its directors, officers, or majority stockholders, in acquiring stock of minority shareholder.
7 A.L.R.3d 500.

Liability of corporate directors for negligence in permitting mismanagement or defalcation by officers or employees.
25 A.L.R.3d 941.

Liability of corporate directors or officers for negligence in permitting conversion of property of third persons by corporation.
29 A.L.R.3d 660.

Persons liable under statutes imposing, upon directors, officers, or trustees of a corporation, personal liability for its debts on account of their failure to file or publish reports, required by law, as to corporate matters.
39 A.L.R.3d 428.

What amounts to participation by corporate officer or agent in illegal issuance of security, in order to impose liability upon him under state securities regulations.
44 A.L.R.3d 588.

Liability of corporate officer or director for commission or compensation received from third person in connection with that person’s transaction with corporation.
47 A.L.R.3d 373.

Personal liability of officer or directors of corporation on corporate checks issued against insufficient funds.
47 A.L.R.3d 1250.

Test in stockholders’ actions as to reasonableness of compensation of corporate officers who as directors determine their own compensation.
53 A.L.R.3d 358.

Liability of director or dominant shareholder for enforcing debt legally owed him by corporation.
56 A.L.R.3d 212.

Personal civil liability of officer or director of corporation for negligence of subordinate employee causing personal injury or death of third person.
90 A.L.R.3d 916.

Validity of stockholders’ agreement allegedly infringing on directors’ management powers – modern cases.
15 A.L.R.4th 1078.

Financial inability of corporation to take advantage of business opportunity as affecting determination whether “corporate opportunity” was presented.
16 A.L.R.4th 185.

Purchase of shares of corporation by director or officer as usurpation of “corporate opportunity.”
16 A.L.R.4th 784.

Personal liability of stockholder, officer, or agent for debt of foreign corporation doing business in the state.
27 A.L.R.4th 387.

Time for bringing suit to recover insider short-swing profits under sec. 16(b) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 ( 15 USCS sec. 78p(b)).
67 A.L.R. Fed. 849.

Proper measure and elements of recovery for insider short-swing transaction.
86 A.L.R. Fed. 16.

18B Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations §§ 1455 et seq.

7A Am. Jur. Pl & Pr Forms (Rev), Corporations, Forms 162 et seq., 263.1 (complaint by judgment creditor against sole stockholder receiving distributions of corporate property causing corporation to become insolvent), 312 et seq.

8 Am. Jur. Proof of Facts 2d 193, Personal Liability of Corporate Officer on Promissory Note.

19 C.J.S., Corporations §§ 848 et seq.

Smith, Recognition of the fiduciary duties of corporate directors and officers defending against change of control by tender offer.
7 Miss. C. L. Rev. 117, Spring, 1987.

Transactions between a corporation and its directors: Where does Mississippi stand?
52 Miss L. J. 877, December, 1982.